Hawaii, session 2026, SB3051.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 321-483, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b)  The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 relating to: (1)  Standards of conditions and competence for the operation of community care foster family homes; (2)  Procedures for obtaining and renewing a certificate of approval from the department; (3)  Minimum grievance procedures for clients of community care foster family home services; and (4)  Requirements for primary and substitute caregivers caring for three clients in community care foster family homes including: (A)  Mandating that primary and substitute caregivers be twenty-one years of age or older; (B)  Mandating that primary and substitute caregivers complete a minimum of twelve hours of continuing education every twelve months or at least twenty‑four hours of continuing education every twenty-four months; (C)  Allowing the primary caregiver to be absent from the community care foster family home for no more than [twenty-eight] forty-eight hours in a calendar week[, not to exceed five hours per day;] with no absence longer than twenty-four consecutive hours; provided that the substitute caregiver is present in the community care foster family home during the primary caregiver's absence; (D)  Where the primary caregiver is absent from the community care foster family home in excess of the hours as prescribed in subparagraph (C), mandating that the substitute caregiver be a certified nurse aide; and (E)  Mandating that the substitute caregiver have, at a minimum, one year prior work experience as a caregiver in a community residential setting or in a medical facility." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________